bg-BG: Монтаж на предпазна релса: Регулируема; Постоянна; Преносима; Други
zh-TW: 安全護欄安裝: 可調節式; 永久型; 可攜式; 其他
vi: Lắp đặt đường ray an toàn: Có thể điều chỉnh; Vĩnh viễn; Xách tay; Khác
el: Εγκατάσταση ράγας ασφαλείας: Ρυθμιζόμενο; Μόνιμο; Φορητό; Άλλο
hu: Biztonsági korlátok felszerelése: Állítható; Állandó; Hordozható; Egyéb
en: Safety rail installation: Adjustable; Permanent; Portable; Other
ru: Установка защитного ограждения: Регулируемый; Постоянный; Портативный; Другой
es: Instalación de barandilla de seguridad: Ajustable; Permanente; Portátil; Otros
pt-PT: Instalação de calha de segurança: Ajustável; Permanente; Portáteis; Outro
ja: サイドレールの設置: 調整可能; 取り外し不可; ポータブル; その他
sk-SK: Inštalácia bezpečnostného zábradlia: Nastaviteľný; Trvalý; Prenosný; Iné
ko: 안전 가드 설치: 조절식; 영구; 이동식; 기타
pt-BR: Instalação de trilho de segurança: Ajustável; Permanente; Portátil; Outro
ro-RO: Instalare șină de siguranță: Reglabilă; Permanentă; Portabilă; Altele
sv: Installation av säkerhetsskena: Justerbar; Permanent; Bärbar; Övrigt
cs: Instalace zábran/zábradlí: Nastavitelný; Permanentní; Přenosné; Jiné
th: การติดตั้งรางนิรภัย: แบบปรับได้; ถาวร; แบบพกพา; อื่นๆ
fi: Turvakaiteen asennus: Säädettävä; Pysyvä; Siirrettävät; Muu
da: Montering af sikkerhedsskinne: Justerbar; Permanent; Transportabel; Andet
hr-HR: Postavljanje zaštitne ograde: Podesivo; Trajno; Prijenosno; Ostalo
nl: Installatie veiligheidsrail: Verstelbaar; Permanent; Draagbaar; Andere
it: Installazione della ringhiera di sicurezza: Regolabile; Permanenti; Portatile; Altro
tr: Emniyet rayı kurulumu: Ayarlanabilir; Kalıcı; Taşınabilir; Diğer
sl-SI: Namestitev varnostne ograje: Prilagodljivo; Trajno; Prenosno; Drugo
fr: Installation de garde-corps: Ajustables; Permanent; Portable; Autre
pl: Montaż barierki bezpieczeństwa: Regulowane; Stała; Przenośny; Inne
de: Montage des Sicherheitsgeländers: Einstellbar; Permanent; Tragbar; Sonstiges
nb: Montering av sikkerhetsskinne: Regulerbar; Permanent; Bærbar; Annet
lt-LT: Apsauginių turėklų montavimas: Reguliuojami; Įmontuoti; Nešiojami; Kita
zh-CN: 安全导轨安装: 可调节; 永久性; 便携式; 其他